apertium-tur.tur.lexc
LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

iç%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<nom%>:iç # ;
iç%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<nom%>:iç%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
iç%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:iç%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
iç%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<attr%>:iç # ;
iç%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:iç%>l%{A%}r # ;
iç%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>%<pl%>:iç%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
na%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>%<nom%>:na # ;
na%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>%<nom%>:na%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
na%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:na%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
na%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>%<attr%>:na # ;
na%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:na%>l%{A%}r # ;
na%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>%<pl%>:na%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;




LEXICON NP-AL-PL

%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>l%{A%}r # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>:%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
%<np%>%<al%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ACR

%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>:%' V-NOPERS-COP ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%' N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:nun CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:na CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:nu CLIT ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:nunki%{n%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>%<attr%>:ndaki ATTR-SUBST ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<ins%>:nunla # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:nu%{n%} CASE ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:nlar CASE-ETC ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:nları%{n%} CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-NERE

%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:%>enin # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:%>eye CLIT-GENERAL  ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:%>eyi # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:%>eden # ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:%>ede CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:%>de CLIT-GENERAL ; ! Dir/LR
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>esi CASE ;
%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:%>edeki ATTR-SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG 
nere:nere PRON-ITG-INFL ; !

ne:ne PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
neyi:neyi PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
ne:ne PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
niye:niye PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
kim:kim PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"
kim%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px3sp%>:kimi%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ; ! 
kim%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px3pl%>:kimiler%>%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ; ! 
hangi:hangi PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "which"
nedir:nedir PRON-ITG-INFL ;
nere:ner PRON-ITG-NERE ; ! ""
ne% kadar: ne% kadar PRON-ITG-INFL ;
herhangi:herhangi PRON-ITG-INFL ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex
%<prn%>%<qnt%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex

LEXICON PRON-QNT-ÇOĞU

%<prn%>%<qnt%>%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ; ! FIXME: Check contlex
%<prn%>%<qnt%>:%{n%} CASE-NONOM ; ! FIXME: Check contlex


LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: POSS-REAL ;


LEXICON PRON-NEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASE ;

!!LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV
!!
!!CASE-ETC ;
!!%<adv%>:ç%{A%} CLIT ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME:
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSS-REAL. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon
%<prn%>%<ref%>: CASE-ETC ;                
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1sg%>:%>%{i%}m CASE-ETC ;                
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>:%>%{i%}n CASE-ETC ;                 
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ; 
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ; 
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1pl%>:%>%{i%}m%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;           
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>:%>%{i%}n%{I%}z CASE-ETC ;      
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;  

LEXICON PRON-ADV 

%<prn%>%<adv%>: CASE-NONOM ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!	CONJUNCTIONS, CAUSE EVEN SENTENCES AND WORDS WANNA BE TOGETHER !!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON CA

%<cnjadv%>: # ;

LEXICON CS 

%<cnjsub%>: # ;

LEXICON CC

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;

LEXICON POSTADV

%<postadv%>: # ;




!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Numeral paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NUM

%<num%>: # ;                                        ! Beş evi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} V-COP ;               ! Beşinci evi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} SUBST ;      ! Beşinciyi görüyorum.
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                           ! Beşi görüyorum.

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Adverb paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADV1

%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>: V-COP ;
! %<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
!%<prn%>: SUBST ;               ! FMT: Adverbs are not pronouns!!!
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} # ;

LEXICON ADV2

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>: V-COP ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON ADV3

%<adv%>: # ;
%<adv%>: V-COP ;

LEXICON ADV4

%<adv%>: # ; ! this is for when the adverb is used as an adverb
%<adv%>: V-COP ;
!%<adv%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;
%<adv%>%<attr%>:%>k%{I%} # ;

LEXICON ADV-ITG

%<adv%>%<itg%>: V-COP ; 
%<adv%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Adjective paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADJ-CLIT

!! CLIT-NOPERS ;
COPULA-MIMIS ;
# ;

!!LEXICON PRED-CLIT
!!
!!COPULA-MIMIS ;
!!# ;
!!
LEXICON A1

%<adj%>: ADJ-CLIT ; 
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: ADJ-CLIT ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON A3

%<adj%>: ADJ-CLIT ;
%<adj%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON A4

%<adj%>: CLIT-NOPERS ; ! FIXME: Check for overgeneration e.g. vardiyim
%<adj%>: V-NOPERS-COP ; ! FIXME: Check for overgeneration e.g. vardiyim

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Verb paradigms
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON  Conjunctions
gerçi:gerçi CC ;
eğer:eğer CS ;
asla% da:asla% da CC ; !
ta:ta CC ; !
şu% ki:şu% ki CC ; !
eğer:eğer CC ; !
artı:artı CC ; ! "plus"
fakat:fakat CC ; 
hem% de:hem% de CC ; !
ile:ile CC ; ! "and"
lakin:lakin CC ; 
sırasında:sırasında CC ;
ve:u CC ; ! "and" Dir/LR - literary
ya% da:ya% da CC ; 
ki:ki CS ; 
diye:diye CS ; 
olarak:olarak CS ; 
gibi:gibi CS ; 
eğer:eğer CS ; 
şayet:şayet CS ; 
nedeniyle:nedeniyle CS ;
aksine:aksine CA ; 
bilakis:bilakis CA ; 
demek:demek CA ; 
hani:hani CA ; 
ister:ister CA ; 
kısacası:kısacası CA ; 
meğerki:meğerki CA ; 
neyse:neyse CA ; 
peki:peki CA ; 
ya:ya CA ; 
hiç% olmazsa:hiç% olmazsa CA ; 
daha% doğrusu:daha% doğrusu CA ; 
LEXICON Determiners
her% şey:her% şey PRON-QNT ; !
hepsi:hepsi PRON-QNT ; ! "all"
LEXICON Numerals
iki:İki NUM ; ! "two" ! Dir/LR
üç:üç NUM ; ! "three"
beş:beş NUM ; ! "five"
yedi:yedi NUM ; ! "seven"
dokuz:dokuz NUM ; ! "nine"
yetmiş:yetmiş NUM ; ! "seventy"
otuz:otuz NUM ; ! "thirty"
altmış:altmış NUM ; ! "sixty"
kırk:kırk NUM ; ! "forty"
yüz:yüz NUM ; ! "hundred"
milyar:milyar NUM ; ! "milliard"
buçuk:buçuk NUM ; ! "half"
LEXICON Nouns
Football:Football NP-AL ; !
Belediyespor:Belediyespor NP-AL ; !
Saint:Saint NP-AL ; !
les:les NP-AL ; !
LEXICON ProperNouns
Drakula:Drakula NP-AL ; !
United:United NP-AL ; !
ABD:ABD%{ь%} NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
AB:AB%{ь%} NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
BH:BH%{ь%} NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
BiH:BiH%{ь%} NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
SSCB:SSCB%{ь%} NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
ABC:ABC%{ь%} NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
EU:EU NP-TOP-ACR ; ! ""
San:San NP-AL ; !
GERB:GERB NP-AL ; ! ""
Sovyet:Sovyet NP-AL-PL ; ! ""
Rosselhoznadzor:Rosselhoznadzor NP-AL ; ! ""
Tribune:Tribune NP-AL ; ! ""
Europe:Europe NP-AL ; ! ""
NTV:NTV%{ь%} NP-AL ;
Anatolyevich:Anatolyevich NP-PAT-VICH ; !Use/MT
Anatolyev:Anatolyev NP-PAT-VICH ;
Buharev:Buharev NP-PAT-VICH ;
Firkov:Firkov NP-PAT-VICH ;
İosifov:İosifov NP-PAT-VICH ;
Markov:Markov NP-PAT-VICH ;
Nikolayev:Nikolayev NP-PAT-VICH ;
Romanov:Romanov NP-PAT-VICH ;
Sergeyev:Sergeyev NP-PAT-VICH ;
Sulkev:Sulkev NP-PAT-VICH ;
Vasilyev:Vasilyev NP-PAT-VICH ;
Yakovlev:Yakovlev NP-PAT-VICH ;
LEXICON Adjectives
yerinde% olan:yerinde% olan A1 ; !
potansiyel:potansiyel A1 ; !
resmi% olarak:resmi% olarak A4 ;
sembolik:sembolik A3 ; !                                                                        
muntazam:muntazam A1 ; !
bakî:bakî A4 ; !
mesut:mesut A1 ; !
miladi:miladi A1 ; !
bölen:bölen A1 ; !
sık:sık A3 ;
yemeklik:yemeklik A4 ;
elcil:elcil A3 ;
dünya% çapındaki:dünya% çapındaki A4 ;
konukçu:konukçu A1 ;
yasak:yasak A2 ; ! "forbidden"
uyumlu:uyumlu A2 ; ! "compatible"
ikili:ikili A2 ; ! "dual"
ela:ela A2 ;  ! "haler (colour)"
ortaklaşa:ortaklaşa A3; ! "collectively"
hidroelektrik:hidroelektrik A4 ; ! "hydroelectric"
amaçli:amaçli A2 ;  ! "guilty"
yağlı:yağlı A1 ;  ! "greasy"
tedbirli:tedbirli A2 ;  ! "cautious"
spesifik:spesifik A4 ;  ! "specific"
çürük:çürük A2 ;  ! "rotten"
uygunsuz:uygunsuz A1 ;  ! "inappropriate"
fasarya:fasarya A4 ;  ! ""
iç:iç A3 ;  ! ""
konserve:konserve A2 ;  ! ""
askeri:askeri A3 ;  ! ""
milletlerarası:milletlerarası A2 ;  ! ""
trajik:trajik A4 ;  ! ""
teknolojik:teknolojik A4 ;  ! ""
informatik:informatik A4 ;  ! ""
sorunsal:sorunsal A4 ;  ! ""
mübadil:mübadil A1 ;  ! ""
kesin:kesin A2 ;  ! ""
mutlu:mutlu A2 ;  ! ""
pisboğaz:pisboğaz A1 ;  ! ""
kimsesiz:kimsesiz A3;  ! ""
dağlık:dağlık A3 ;
LEXICON Adverbs
mucibince:mucibince ADV1 ;
anca:anca ADV1 ; !
doğaçtan:doğaçtan ADV1 ; !
yaman:yaman ADV1 ; !
bura:bura ADV1 ; !
daha% da:daha% da ADV1 ;
en% az:en% az ADV1 ;
şimdi:şimdi ADV4 ; ! "now"
hatta:hatta ADV3 ;
her% yıl:her% yıl ADV3 ;
tahminen:tahminen ADV3 ;
aynen:aynen ADV3 ; ! "exactly"
bizatihi:bizatihi ADV3 ; ! "actually"
bugün:bugün ADV4 ; ! "today" @@@ IS ALSO NOUN, NO ADJECTIVE THOUGH
doludizgin:doludizgin ADV3 ; ! "at full speed"
geceleyin:geceleyin ADV3 ; ! "usually at night"
harrangürra:harrangürra ADV3 ; ! "in a disorderly manner"
kamilen:kamilen ADV3 ; ! "wholly"
münferiden:münferiden ADV3 ; ! "solely"
eğer:eğer ADV1 ; !
birbirine:birbirine ADV1 ;
o% kadar:o% kadar ADV1 ; ! 
geçmeden:geçmeden ADV1 ; ! ! Use/MT
aksi% halde:aksi% halde ADV1 ; ! Use/MT
apaçık:apaçık  ADV2 ; ! "obviously"
azıcık:azıcık  ADV2 ; ! "slightly"
bertaraf:bertaraf  ADV2 ; ! "aside"
bilfiil:bilfiil  ADV2 ; ! "defacto"
biteviye:biteviye  ADV2 ; ! "ceaslessly"
çabucak:çabucak  ADV2 ; ! "fastly"
epey:epey  ADV2 ; ! "reasonably"
gerisingeriye:gerisingeriye  ADV2 ; ! "backwards"
halisane:halisane ADV2 ; ! "sincerely"
kısmen:kısmen ADV2 ; ! "partly" "tolerable"
acele:acele ADV2 ; ! "fastly"
önce:önce ADV4 ; ! "previously" @@@@ postp
sonra:sonra ADV4 ; ! "after, afterwards" @@@ also postp
toptan:toptan ADV3 ; ! "collectively"
nasıl:nasıl ADV-ITG ; ! "how" ! FIXME: also adj?  or det?
niçin:niçin ADV-ITG ; ! "why"
ne% kadar:ne% kadar ADV-ITG ; ! ""
neden:neden ADV-ITG ;
ne% zaman:ne% zaman ADV-ITG ;
ne:ne ADV-ITG ; !Use/MT
nerde:nerde ADV-ITG ; !Use/MT
nereye:nereye ADV-ITG ; !
nere:nere ADV-ITG ; !
